Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6024
Notices.

All notices by the director to an insurer or a health organization which may result in regulatory action under the Insurers and Health Organizations Risk-Based Capital Act shall be effective upon dispatch if transmitted by registered or certified mail or, in the case of any other transmission, shall be effective upon the insurer's or health organization's receipt of such notice.

Laws 1993, LB 583, § 36;

Laws 1994, LB 978, § 46;

Laws 1999, LB 258, § 30.